North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-32 Administrative Agencies Practice Act
28-32-18.
Administrative rules committee may void rule — Grounds — Amendment by agreement of agency and committee.

The legislative management’s administrative rules committee may find that all or any portion of a rule is void if that rule is initially considered by the committee not later than the fifteenth day of the month before the date of the administrative code supplement in which the rule change is scheduled to appear. The administrative rules committee may find a rule or portion of a rule void if the committee makes the specific finding that, with regard to that rule or portion of a rule, there is:

An absence of statutory authority.

An emergency relating to public health, safety, or welfare.

A failure to comply with express legislative intent or to substantially meet the procedural requirements of this chapter for adoption of the rule.

A conflict with state law.

Arbitrariness and capriciousness.

A failure to make a written record of its consideration of written and oral submissions respecting the rule under section 28-32-11.

The administrative rules committee may find a rule void at the meeting at which the rule is initially considered by the committee or may hold consideration of that rule for one subsequent meeting. If no representative of the agency appears before the administrative rules committee when rules are scheduled for committee consideration, those rules are held over for consideration at the next subsequent committee meeting. Rules are not considered initially considered by the committee under this subsection until a representative of the agency appears before the administrative rules committee when the rules are scheduled for committee consideration. If no representative of the agency appears before the administrative rules committee meeting to which rules are held over for consideration, the rules are void if the rules were adopted as emergency rules and for rules not adopted as emergency rules the administrative rules committee may void the rules, allow the rules to become effective, or hold over consideration of the rules to the next subsequent committee meeting. Within three business days after the administrative rules committee finds that a rule is void, the legislative council shall provide written notice of that finding and the committee’s specific finding under subdivisions a through f of subsection 1 to the adopting agency and to the chairman of the legislative management. Within fourteen days after receipt of the notice, the adopting agency may file a petition with the chairman of the legislative management for review by the legislative management of the decision of the administrative rules committee. If the adopting agency does not file a petition for review, the rule becomes void on the fifteenth day after the notice from the legislative council to the adopting agency. If within sixty days after receipt of the petition from the adopting agency the legislative management has not disapproved by motion the finding of the administrative rules committee, the rule is void.

An agency may amend or repeal a rule or create a related rule if, after consideration of rules by the administrative rules committee, the agency and committee agree that the rule amendment, repeal, or creation is necessary to address any of the considerations under subsection 1. A rule amended, repealed, or created under this subsection is not subject to the other requirements of this chapter relating to adoption of administrative rules and may be published by the legislative council as amended, repealed, or created. If requested by the agency or any interested party, a rule amended, repealed, or created under this subsection must be reconsidered by the administrative rules committee at a subsequent meeting at which public comment on the agreed rule change must be allowed.

An absence of statutory authority.

An emergency relating to public health, safety, or welfare.

A failure to comply with express legislative intent or to substantially meet the procedural requirements of this chapter for adoption of the rule.

A conflict with state law.

Arbitrariness and capriciousness.

A failure to make a written records of its consideration of written and oral submissions respecting the rule under section 28-32-11.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2005, ch. 287, § 4; 2009, ch. 482, § 26; 2011, ch. 234, § 4.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 293, S.L. 2001, provides: “

28-32-18. Administrative rules committee may suspend rule — Grounds — Amendment by agreement of agency and committee.

1.

The legislative council’s administrative rules committee may find, for any reason under this subsection, that all or any portion of a rule should be reviewed by the legislative assembly, and the committee may suspend the rule or portion of a rule under this subsection if that rule is initially considered by the committee within ninety days after the date of the administrative code supplement in which the rule change appears, or, for rule changes appearing in the administrative code supplement from November first immediately preceding a regular session of the legislative assembly through the following May first, if that rule is initially considered by the committee at the first meeting of the administrative rules committee following the regular session of the legislative assembly. A rule or portion of a rule suspended under this subsection becomes permanently ineffective unless it is ratified by both houses of the legislative assembly during the next session of the legislative assembly, in which case it is effective as of the date of ratification by the second house of the legislative assembly. An agency seeking ratification of its rule shall introduce a bill for that purpose. The administrative rules committee may suspend a rule or portion of a rule if the committee makes the specific finding that, with regard to that rule or portion of a rule, there is:

2.

The administrative rules committee may suspend a rule at the meeting at which the rule is initially considered by the committee or may hold consideration of that rule for one subsequent meeting. Within three business days after the administrative rules committee suspends a rule, the office of the legislative council shall provide written notice of that suspension and the committee’s specific finding under subdivisions a through f of subsection 1 to the adopting agency and to the chairman of the legislative council. Within fourteen days after receipt of the notice, the adopting agency may file a petition with the chairman of the legislative council for review by the legislative council of the decision of the administrative rules committee. After receipt of the petition and before the next session of the legislative assembly, the legislative council by approval of a motion may lift the suspension and reinstate the rule’s effectiveness.

3.

An agency may amend or repeal a rule or create a related rule if, after consideration of rules by the administrative rules committee, the agency and committee agree that the rule amendment, repeal, or creation is necessary to address any of the considerations under subsection 1. A rule amended, repealed, or created under this subsection is not subject to the other requirements of this chapter relating to adoption of administrative rules and maybe resubmitted by the agency to the legislative council for publication as amended, repealed, or created and reconsidered by the administrative rules committee at a subsequent meeting at which public comment on the agreed rule change must be allowed.”

Section 36 of chapter 293, S.L. 2001, provides in part:

“Section 13 of this Act [this section] is suspended from operation and becomes effective retroactive to August 1, 2001, upon a ruling by the North Dakota supreme court that any portion of subsection 1 of section 28-32-18 as created by section 12 of this Act is unconstitutional.”

28-32-18.1.
Administrative rules committee review of existing rules.

Upon request by the administrative rules committee, an administrative agency or the commission shall brief the committee on its existing rules and point out any provisions that appear to be obsolete and any areas in which statutory or constitutional authority has changed or been repealed since the rules were adopted or amended.

An agency or the commission may amend or repeal a rule without complying with the other requirements of this chapter relating to adoption of rules and may resubmit the change to the legislative council for publication provided:

The agency or commission initiates the request to the administrative rules committee for consideration of the amendment or repeal;

The agency or commission provides notice to the regulated community, in a manner reasonably calculated to provide notice to those persons interested in the rule, of the time and place the administrative rules committee will consider the request for amendment or repeal of the rule; and

The agency or commission and the administrative rules committee agree the rule amendment or repeal eliminates a provision that is obsolete or no longer in compliance with law and that no detriment would result to the substantive rights of the regulated community from the amendment or repeal.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 298, § 1; 2019, ch. 472, § 19, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-19.
Publication of administrative code and code supplement.

The legislative council shall compile, index, and publish all rules filed pursuant to this chapter in a publication which must be known as the North Dakota Administrative Code, in this chapter referred to as the code. The code also must contain all objections filed with the legislative council by the administrative rules committee pursuant to section 28-32-17. The legislative council shall revise all or part of the code as often as the legislative council determines necessary.

The legislative council may prescribe the format, style, and arrangement for rules to be published in the code and may refuse to accept the filing of any rule that is not in substantial compliance with the format, style, and arrangement. In arranging rules for publication, the legislative council may make corrections in spelling, grammatical construction, format, and punctuation of the rules as the legislative council determines are proper. The legislative council shall keep and maintain a permanent code of all rules filed, including superseded and repealed rules, which must be open to public inspection during office hours.

The legislative council shall compile and publish the North Dakota Administrative Code supplement according to the schedule of effective dates of rules in section 28-32-15.

The code supplement must contain all rules that have been filed with the legislative council or which have become effective since the compilation and publication of the preceding issue of the code supplement.

The code supplement must contain all objections filed with the legislative council by the administrative rules committee pursuant to section 28-32-17.

The legislative council, with the consent of the adopting agency or commission, may omit from the code or code supplement any rule the publication of which would be unduly cumbersome, expensive, or otherwise inexpedient, if the rule in printed or duplicated form is made available on application to the agency or commission, and if the code or code supplement contains a notice stating the general subject matter of the omitted rule and how a copy may be obtained.

The code must be arranged, indexed, and printed or duplicated in a manner to permit separate publication of portions thereof relating to individual agencies. An agency may print as many copies of such separate portions of the code as it may require. If the legislative council does not publish the code supplement due to technological problems or lack of funds, the agency whose rules would have been published in the code supplement shall provide a copy of the rules to any person upon request. The agency may charge a fee for a copy of the rules as allowed under section 44-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2005, ch. 287, § 5; 2007, ch. 388, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, § 27; 2019, ch. 472, §§ 20, 21, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-20.
Notification of code and code supplement.

The legislative council shall publish the code and code supplement on the legislative branch website.

The secretary of state shall send electronic notification of quarterly updates to the code without charge to the following:

Governor.

Attorney general.

Each supreme court justice.

Each district court judge.

Each county auditor of this state.

Supreme court library.

State library.

Law library of the university of North Dakota.

Each of the five depository libraries in this state.

Upon request, to any person requesting electronic notification of quarterly updates to the code

If applicable, the administrative code, revisions to the administrative code, and the code supplement must be considered sixth-class printing under sections 46-02-04 and 46-02-09.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2009, ch. 482, § 28; 2019, ch. 267, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

28-32-21.
Adjudicative proceedings — Procedures.

Administrative agencies shall comply with the following procedures in all adjudicative proceedings:

For adjudicative proceedings involving a hearing on a complaint against a specific-named respondent, a complainant shall prepare and file a clear and concise complaint with the agency having subject matter jurisdiction of the proceeding. The complaint shall contain a concise statement of the claims or charges upon which the complainant relies, including reference to the statute or rule alleged to be violated, and the relief sought.

After a complaint is filed, the appropriate administrative agency shall serve a copy of the complaint upon the respondent in the manner allowed for the service of process under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure at least forty-five days before the hearing on the complaint.

The administrative agency shall designate the time and place for the hearing and shall serve a copy of the notice of hearing upon the respondent in the manner allowed for service under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, at least twenty days before the hearing on the complaint. Service of the notice of hearing may be waived in writing by the respondent, or the parties may agree on a definite time and place for hearing with the consent of the agency having jurisdiction.

A complaint may be served less than forty-five days before the time specified for a hearing on the complaint and a notice of hearing on a complaint may be served less than twenty days before the time specified for hearing if otherwise authorized by statute. However, an administrative hearing regarding the renewal, suspension, or revocation of a license may not be held fewer than ten days after the licensee has been served, personally or by certified mail, with a copy of a notice for hearing with an affidavit, complaint, specification of issues, or other document alleging violations upon which the license hearing is based.

A complaint may inform the respondent that an answer to the complaint must be served upon the complainant and the agency with which the complaint is filed within twenty days after service of the complaint, or the agency may deem the complaint to be admitted. If the respondent fails to answer as required within twenty days after service of the complaint, the agency may enter an order in default as the facts and law may warrant. Answers must be served in the manner allowed for service under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

Service is complete upon compliance with the provisions of the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. Proof of service may be made as provided in the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

A respondent may be given less than twenty days to answer the complaint, pursuant to another statute, but no respondent may be required to answer a complaint in less than five days and an answer must be served on the complainant and the agency with which the complaint is filed at least two days before the hearing on the complaint.

Amended and supplemental pleadings may be served and filed with the agency in the manner allowed for amended and supplemental pleadings under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

At any hearing in an adjudicative proceeding, the parties shall be afforded opportunity to present evidence and to examine and cross-examine witnesses as is permitted under sections 28-32-24 and 28-32-35.

If the adjudicative proceeding does not involve a hearing on a complaint against a specific-named respondent, the provisions of subsection 1 do not apply. Unless otherwise provided by law, the provisions of subdivisions b through d apply.

The administrative agency shall designate the time and place for the hearing and shall serve a copy of the notice of hearing upon all the parties in the manner allowed for service under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure at least twenty days before the hearing. Service of the notice of hearing may be waived in writing by the parties, or the parties may agree on a definite time and place for the hearing with the consent of the agency having jurisdiction.

A hearing under this subsection may not be held unless the parties have been properly served with a copy of the notice of hearing as well as a written specification of issues for hearing or other document indicating the issues to be considered and determined at the hearing. In lieu of, or in addition to, a specification of issues or other document, an explanation about the nature of the hearing and the issues to be considered and determined at the hearing may be contained in the notice.

Service is complete upon compliance with the provisions of the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. Proof of service may be made as provided in the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-22.
Informal disposition.

Unless otherwise prohibited by specific statute or rule, informal disposition may be made of any adjudicative proceeding, or any part or issue thereof, by stipulation, settlement, waiver of hearing, consent order, default, alternative dispute resolution, or other informal disposition, subject to agency approval. Any administrative agency may adopt rules of practice or procedure for informal disposition if such rules do not substantially prejudice the rights of any party. Such rules may establish procedures for converting an administrative matter from one type of proceeding to another type of proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-23.
Adjudicative proceedings — Exceptions — Rules of procedure.

Notwithstanding the requirements for standardization of procedures in adjudicative proceedings under this chapter, an administrative agency may adopt specific agency rules of procedure not inconsistent with this chapter. An administrative agency may also adopt specific agency rules of procedure when necessary to comply with requirements found elsewhere in this code or when necessary to comply with the requirements of federal statutes, rules, or standards.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-24.
Evidence to be considered by agency — Official notice.

The admissibility of evidence in any adjudicative proceeding before an administrative agency shall be determined in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Evidence. An administrative agency, or any person conducting proceedings for it, may waive application of the North Dakota Rules of Evidence if a waiver is necessary to ascertain the substantial rights of a party to the proceeding, but only relevant evidence shall be admitted. The waiver must be specifically stated, orally or in writing, either prior to or at a hearing or other proceeding.

All objections offered to evidence shall be noted in the record of the proceeding. No information or evidence except that which has been offered, admitted, and made a part of the official record of the proceeding shall be considered by the administrative agency, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Upon proper objection, evidence that is irrelevant, immaterial, unduly repetitious, or excludable on constitutional or statutory grounds, or on the basis of evidentiary privilege recognized in the courts of this state, may be excluded. In the absence of proper objection, the agency, or any person conducting a proceeding for it, may exclude objectionable evidence.

The North Dakota Rules of Evidence in regard to privileges apply at all stages of an administrative proceeding under this chapter.

All testimony must be made under oath or affirmation. Relevant statements presented by nonparties may be received as evidence if all parties are given an opportunity to cross-examine the nonparty witness or to otherwise challenge or rebut the statements. Nonparties may not examine or cross-examine witnesses except pursuant to a grant of intervention.

Evidence may be received in written form if doing so will expedite the proceeding without substantial prejudice to the interests of any party.

Official notice may be taken of any facts that could be judicially noticed in the courts of this state. Additionally, official notice may be taken of any facts as authorized in agency rules.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-25.
Adjudicative proceedings — Consideration of information not presented at a hearing.

In any adjudicative proceeding, an administrative agency may avail itself of competent and relevant information or evidence in its possession or furnished by members of its staff, or secured from any person in the course of an independent investigation conducted by the agency, in addition to the evidence presented at the hearing. It may do so after first transmitting a copy of the information or evidence or an abstract thereof to each party of record in the proceeding. The agency must afford each party, upon written request, an opportunity to examine the information or evidence and to present its own information or evidence and to cross-examine the person furnishing the information or evidence. Any further testimony that is necessary shall be taken at a hearing to be called and held, giving at least ten days’ notice. Notice must be served upon the parties in the manner allowed for service under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. This section also applies to information officially noticed after the hearing when the issuance of any initial or final order is based in whole or in part on the facts or material noticed.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-26.
Costs of investigation.

An agency may assess the costs of an investigation to a person found to be in violation of a statute or rule as a result of an adjudicative proceeding or informal disposition. The total costs assessed and any civil penalty that may be imposed as a result of violation may not exceed the statutorily authorized civil penalty for the violation. For the purposes of this section, costs mean reasonable out-of-pocket agency costs, not including any attorney’s fees, actually incurred in conducting the investigation for which they may be assessed. Any such costs paid must be paid into the general fund and are appropriated as a refund to the agency for the purposes of defraying the costs of undertaking the investigation.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-27.
Hearing officer — Disqualification — Substitution.

Any person or persons presiding for the agency in an administrative proceeding must be referred to individually or collectively as hearing officer. Any person from the office of administrative hearings presiding for the agency as a hearing officer in an administrative proceeding must be referred to as an administrative law judge.

Any hearing officer is subject to disqualification for good cause shown.

Any party may petition for the disqualification of any person presiding as a hearing officer upon discovering facts establishing grounds for disqualification.

A person whose disqualification is requested shall determine whether to grant the petition, stating facts and reasons for the determination.

If a substitute is required for a person who is disqualified or becomes unavailable for any other reason, the substitute may be appointed by:

The attorney general, if the disqualified or unavailable person is an assistant attorney general;

The agency head, if the disqualified or unavailable person is one or more members of the agency head or one or more other persons designated by the agency head;

A supervising hearing officer, if the disqualified or unavailable person is a hearing officer designated from an office, pool, panel, or division of hearing officers; or

The governor, in all other cases.

Any action taken by a duly appointed substitute for a disqualified or unavailable person is as effective as if taken by the disqualified or unavailable person.

Any hearing officer in an administrative proceeding, from the time of appointment or designation, may exercise any authority granted by law or rule. A hearing officer may be designated to preside over the entire administrative proceeding and may issue orders accordingly. A procedural hearing officer may only issue orders in regard to the course and conduct of the hearing under statute or rule and to otherwise effect an orderly hearing. If a procedural hearing officer is designated, the agency head must be present at the hearing and the agency head shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of law, as well as any order resulting from the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-28.
Intervention.

An administrative agency may grant intervention in an adjudicative proceeding to promote the interests of justice if intervention will not impair the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceeding and if the petitioning intervenor demonstrates that the petitioner’s legal rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests may be substantially affected by the proceeding or that the petitioner qualifies as an intervenor under any provision of statute or rule. The agency may impose conditions and limitations upon intervention. The agency shall give reasonable notice of the intervention to all parties. An administrative agency may adopt rules relating to intervention in an adjudicative proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-29.
Prehearing conference.

Before a hearing, an administrative agency may conduct a prehearing conference after giving reasonable notice to all parties and other interested persons. A prehearing conference may be conducted in total or in part by making use of telephone, facsimile services, television, or other electronic means, as long as such use does not substantially prejudice or infringe on the rights and interests of any party. An administrative agency may adopt rules regarding the availability of, notice of, and procedures for prehearing conferences.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-30.
Default.

If a party fails to attend or participate in a prehearing conference, hearing, or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding, the agency may enter and serve upon all parties written notice of default and a default order, including a statement of the grounds for default.

Within seven days after service of the default notice, order, and grounds, the party against whom default was ordered may file a written motion requesting that the default order be vacated and stating the grounds relied upon. During the time within which a party may file a written motion under this section, or at the time of issuing notice and the default order, the agency may adjourn the proceedings or conduct them without the participation of the party against whom a default order was issued, having due regard for the interests of justice and the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceedings. If an agency conducts further proceedings necessary to complete the administrative action without the participation of a party in default, it shall determine all the issues involved, including those affecting the defaulting party.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-31.
Duties of hearing officers.

All hearing officers shall:

Assure that proper notice has been given as required by law.

Conduct only hearings and related proceedings for which proper notice has been given.

Assure that all hearings and related proceedings are conducted in a fair and impartial manner.

Make recommended findings of fact and conclusions of law and issue a recommended order, when appropriate.

Conduct the hearing only and perform such other functions of the proceeding as requested, when an agency requests a hearing officer to preside only as a procedural hearing officer. If the hearing officer is presiding only as a procedural hearing officer, the agency head must be present at the hearing and the agency head shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and issue a final order. The agency shall give proper notice as required by law. The procedural hearing officer may issue orders in regard to the conduct of the hearing pursuant to statute or rule and to otherwise effect an orderly and prompt disposition of the proceedings.

Make findings of fact and conclusions of law and issue a final order, if required by statute or requested by an agency.

Function only as a procedural hearing officer, when an agency requests a hearing officer to preside for a rulemaking hearing. The agency head need not be present. The agency shall give proper notice as required by law.

Perform any and all other functions required by law, assigned by the director of administrative hearings, or delegated to the hearing officer by the agency.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-32.
Emergency adjudicative proceedings.

An administrative agency may use an emergency adjudicative proceeding, in its discretion, in an emergency situation involving imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

In an emergency, the administrative agency may take action pursuant to a specific statute as is necessary to prevent or avoid imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

In an emergency, in the absence of a specific statute, an administrative agency may serve a complaint fewer than forty-five days before the hearing and give notice of a hearing on the complaint by giving less than twenty days’ notice as is necessary to prevent or avoid imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare. But, every party to the emergency adjudicative proceeding must be given a reasonable time within which to serve an answer and to prepare for the hearing, which may be extended by the agency upon good cause being shown.

In an emergency, in the absence of a specific statute, in an adjudicative proceeding that does not involve a complaint against a specific-named respondent, an administrative agency may give notice of a hearing by giving less than twenty days’ notice as is necessary to prevent or avoid imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare. But, every party to the emergency adjudicative proceeding shall be given a reasonable time to prepare for the hearing, which may be extended by the agency upon good cause being shown.

As a result of the emergency adjudicative proceeding, in the absence of a specific statute requiring other administrative action, the administrative agency shall issue an order. The order must include a brief statement of the reasons justifying the determination of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare and requiring an emergency adjudicative proceeding to prevent or avoid the imminent peril.

After issuing an order pursuant to this section, the administrative agency shall proceed as soon as possible to complete any other proceedings related to the emergency adjudicative proceeding that do not involve imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-33.
Adjudicative proceedings — Subpoenas — Discovery — Protective orders.

In an adjudicative proceeding, discovery may be obtained in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

In any adjudicative proceeding, upon the request or motion of any party to the proceeding or upon the hearing officer’s own motion on behalf of the agency, a hearing officer may issue subpoenas, discovery orders, and protective orders in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. A motion to quash or modify, or any other motion relating to subpoenas, discovery, or protective orders must be made to the hearing officer. The hearing officer’s rulings on these motions may be appealed under section 28-32-42 after issuance of the final order by the agency. The cost of issuing and serving a subpoena in any adjudicative proceeding must be paid by the person or agency requesting it.

Any witness who is subpoenaed under the provisions of this section and who appears at a hearing or other part of an adjudicative proceeding, or whose deposition is taken, shall receive the same fees and mileage as a witness in a civil case in the district court. Witness fees and mileage shall be paid by the party or agency at whose instance the witness appears. Any hearing officer may order the payment of witness fees or mileage by the appropriate party or agency.

Subpoenas, discovery orders, protective orders, and other orders issued under this section may be enforced by applying to any judge of the district court for an order requiring the attendance of a witness, the production of all documents and objects described in the subpoena, or otherwise enforcing an order. Failure of a witness or other person to comply with the order of the district court is contempt of court which is punishable by the district court, upon application. The judge may award attorney’s fees to the prevailing party in an application under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2005, ch. 377, § 1; 2007, ch. 388, § 4.

28-32-34.
Administration of oaths — Parties to be advised of perjury provisions.

Any hearing officer in an administrative proceeding has the power to examine witnesses and records and to administer oaths to witnesses. At the time the person presiding administers the oath to a witness, the person shall advise the witness of the provisions of subsection 1 of section 12.1-11-01 and of the maximum penalty for perjury.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-35.
Procedure at hearing.

The person presiding at a hearing shall regulate the course of the hearing in conformity with this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter by an administrative agency, any other applicable laws, and any prehearing order. To the extent necessary for full disclosure of all relevant facts and issues, the person presiding at the hearing shall afford to all parties and other persons allowed to participate the opportunity to respond, present evidence and argument, conduct cross-examination, and submit rebuttal evidence, except as restricted or conditioned by a grant of intervention or by a prehearing order. A hearing may be conducted in total or in part by making use of telephone, television, facsimile services, or other electronic means if each participant in the hearing has an opportunity to participate in, to hear, and, if practicable, to see the entire proceeding while it is taking place, and if such use does not substantially prejudice or infringe on the rights and interests of any party.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-36.
Agency to make record.

An administrative agency shall make a record of all testimony, written statements, documents, exhibits, and other evidence presented at any adjudicative proceeding or other administrative proceeding heard by it. Oral testimony may be taken by a court reporter, by a stenographer, or by use of an electronic recording device. All evidence presented at any proceeding before the administrative agency shall be filed with the agency. A copy of the record of any proceeding before an administrative agency, or a part thereof, must be furnished to any party to the proceeding and to any other person allowed to participate in the proceeding, upon written request submitted to the agency and upon payment of a uniform charge to be set by the agency. Any fee paid to an administrative agency for the record, or a part thereof, shall be paid into the general fund and is appropriated as a refund to the agency for the purposes of defraying the costs of preparing the record. An agency may contract with any person or another agency to prepare a record, or a part thereof, of any proceeding before the agency.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.